Washington statutes.
RCW 16.30.050

City or county ordinances.

A city or county may adopt an ordinance governing potentially dangerous wild animals that is more restrictive than this chapter. However, nothing in this chapter requires a city or county to adopt an ordinance to be in compliance with this chapter.

[ 2007 c 238 s 6.]